South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Healthy Schools Act." SECTION 2.  Article 3, Chapter 10, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-10-325. (A) Beginning July 1, 2027, any public school, excluding charter schools, participating in a federally funded or assisted meal program shall not serve meals or allow a third party to sell ultraprocessed food to students on school premises during the regular instructional day. This subsection does not prevent a student's parent or guardian from providing ultraprocessed food for personal consumption. (B) For the purposes of this section, "ultraprocessed food" means any food or beverage that contains one or more of the following additives: (1) Potassium bromate; (2) Propylparaben; (3) Titanium dioxide; (4) Brominated vegetable oil; (5) Yellow Dye 5 (Tartrazine); (6) Yellow Dye 6 (Sunset Yellow); (7) Blue Dye 1 (Brilliant Blue); (8) Blue Dye 2 (Indigo Carmine); (9) Green Dye 3 (Fast Green); (10) Red Dye 3 (Erythrosine); (11) Red Dye 40 (Allura Red). (C) All food suppliers and manufacturers providing meals to public schools must provide a list of ingredients on packaging or product information sheets, identifying any additives by their common or chemical name, without the use of umbrella terms such as "artificial colors" or "natural flavors." (D) Compliance: (1) Each public school shall annually submit a standardized certification form to the State  Department of Education Office of School Nutrition, attesting compliance with this section. (2) The State  Department of Education shall: (a) post the certification form and a list of compliant schools on its website; and (b) conduct random audits of school meal samples every two years to verify compliance, using third-party laboratory testing if necessary. (3) If a prohibited additive is found: (a) the school and supplier shall receive a warning from the State  Department of Education and sixty calendar days to correct the violation. School or district personnel responsible for procuring food served to students for school breakfast and lunch during the instructional day must undergo training from the State Department of Education regarding the purchase and procurement of food allowed under this section; (b) a second violation incurs a fine of up to $5,000 per supplier. The fine must be paid to the school and used for the purpose of improving or establishing a vegetable garden on school grounds. The school shall report expenditures to the State Department of Education; (c) a third violation may disqualify the supplier from providing school meals for one fiscal  year; and (d) each violation must be reported by the school to its respective school district immediately upon notice of a violation. (E) Review: (1) Every five years, the State  Department of Education, in consultation with the State Department of Agriculture, shall review scientific evidence and international regulations to determine if additional additives should be prohibited. (2) Any recommended changes must be submitted to the State Board of Education for approval and codified by means of regulation. (F) The State  Department of Education shall oversee implementation and ensure compliance with this section. The department also shall issue a model policy and promulgate regulations as it deems necessary to comply with this section. SECTION 3.  The General Assembly finds that: (1) childhood obesity, hyperactivity, and long-term health risks are matters of statewide concern; (2) ultraprocessed foods with synthetic additives contribute to these issues and undermine the nutrition of students in public schools; and (3) taxpayer-funded school meal programs should prioritize student health by eliminating harmful additives. SECTION 4.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----